Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1618
Department; accredit private postsecondary career school; when.

The department may accredit a private postsecondary career school when the school has met the minimum standards specified in the rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 19;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2819;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 18.